Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-347
Commission; Nebraska State Historical Society; recreational trails; cooperative agreements.

(1) The commission is hereby authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with the Nebraska State Historical Society and other appropriate public agencies for the reconnaissance, development, and administration of state historical parks.

(2) The commission may enter into cooperative agreements with appropriate agencies or subdivisions or departments of government for the reconnaissance, development, and administration of state recreational trails.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 11, p. 1467;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 50;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.31;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 105.